Alabama, session 2026rs, HB463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 9-11-86, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§9-11-86
(a) No person, firm, or corporation shall may carry,
ship, or transport beyond the boundaries of this state more
Page 1

ship, or transport beyond the boundaries of this state more
HB463 INTRODUCED
than one day's creel limit of any species of game fish and
then only for his or her personal use. Any person violating
this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on
conviction, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars
($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(b)(1) No person may transport out of this state a live
fish of the family Ictaluridae that is harvested from public
waters as defined in Section 9-11-80.
(2) A person who violates subdivision (1) shall be
punished as follows:
a. On a first violation, a Class B misdemeanor and
fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
b. On a second and any subsequent violation, a Class A
misdemeanor and fined not less then two thousand dollars
($2,000)."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2